Hawaii statutes.
§560:5-407 Confidentiality of records.
The written report of a kokua kanawai and any professional evaluation are
confidential and shall be sealed upon filing, but shall be available to:

(1) The court;

(2) The respondent without limitation as to use;

(3) The petitioner, the kokua kanawai, any nominated
conservator, and the petitioner's, nominated conservator's, and respondent's
lawyers, for purposes of the proceeding; and

(4) Other persons for any purposes that the court may
order for good cause. [L 2004, c 161, pt of §1; am L 2008, c 39, §7]

Rules of Court

Confidentiality of records, see HPR rule 113.1.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next